Utah statutes.
17C-2-501.   Agency to provide notice of hearings.

(1)  Each agency shall provide notice, as provided in this part, of each:

(a)  blight hearing;

(b)  plan hearing; and

(c)  budget hearing.

(2)  The notice required under Subsection (1) for any of the hearings listed in that subsection may be combined with the notice required for any of the other hearings if the hearings are combined under Section 17C-2-401.

